Louisiana, session 2026, HB429.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:61(A)(1) and (4) and (B)(introductory paragraph) and (1)(a)(iii)
and 67.24(C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:61(A)(5) and (6) and
(B)(1)(a)(viii) and (1)(c) and 128.1(A)(6) and (B)(6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§61. Unauthorized entry of a critical infrastructure
A. Unauthorized entry of a critical infrastructure is any of the following:
(1) The intentional entry by a person without authority into any structure or
onto any premises, belonging to another, that constitutes in whole or in part a critical
infrastructure that is completely enclosed or surrounded by any type of physical
barrier.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 429 ENROLLED
(4) The intentional entry into a restricted area of a critical infrastructure
which is marked as a restricted or limited access area that is completely enclosed or
surrounded by any type of physical barrier when the person is not authorized to enter
that restricted or limited access area.
(5) The intentional operation of an unmanned aircraft system, as defined in
R.S. 14:337, without prior express authority, within or over critical infrastructure that
is completely enclosed or surrounded by any type of physical barrier, or within or
over a restricted area of a critical infrastructure which is marked as a restricted or
limited access area, when the person is not authorized to operate within or over that
area.
(6) The intentional and malicious use of any electronic, digital, or
technological means, without authority, to access, control, disrupt, disable,
manipulate, or materially interfere with any camera system, computer, computer
system, computer network, industrial control system, operational technology system,
or other electronically controlled equipment used to operate, monitor, secure, or
control a critical infrastructure.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
(1)(a) "Critical infrastructure" means any and all structures, sites, equipment,
or other immovable or movable property located within or upon any of the
following:
* * *
(iii) Water intake structures and water and sewer treatment facilities.
* * *
(viii) Public drinking water systems including water storage structures, pump
stations, treatment facilities, and transmission lines.
* * *
(c) "Critical infrastructure" includes oil and natural gas facilities and
operations, including but not limited to equipment and products used in drilling,
stimulation, completion, waste disposal, production, transportation, refining,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 429 ENROLLED
processing, storage, delivery, and transmission operations, private and public roads
and storage yards primarily used in such operations, and equipment that travels
between locations in the course and scope of such operations.
* * *
§67.24. Theft of critical infrastructure
* * *
C.(1) Whoever commits the crime of theft of critical infrastructure when the
misappropriation, taking, or illegal possession amounts to a value of less than
twenty-five thousand dollars shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or
imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than fifteen years, or both.
(2) Whoever commits the crime of theft of critical infrastructure when the
misappropriation, taking, or illegal possession amounts to a value of twenty-five
thousand dollars or more shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars, or
imprisoned at hard labor for not more than twenty years, or both.
(3) Whoever commits the crime of theft of critical infrastructure wherein it
is foreseeable that human life will be threatened as a result of the theft shall be fined
not more than fifty thousand dollars, or imprisoned at hard labor for not more than
twenty years, or both.
* * *
§128.1. Terrorism
A. Terrorism is the commission of any of the acts enumerated in this
Subsection, when the offender has the intent to intimidate or coerce the civilian
population, influence the policy of a unit of government by intimidation or coercion,
or affect the conduct of a unit of government by intimidation or coercion:
* * *
(6) Theft or unauthorized entry of a critical infrastructure.
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 429 ENROLLED
(6) Whoever commits the crime of terrorism as provided in Paragraph (A)(6)
of this Section shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not less than five years nor more
than twenty years.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.